Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 51-801 to 51-811:

(1) Basic public library services includes, but is not limited to, free loan of circulating print and nonprint materials from the local collection and general reference and information services;

(2) Local governing authority means the governing body of a county, city, village, or township; and

(3) Public library federation means a library service agency of one or more counties responsible for a planned program of library services to be provided through public libraries which choose to affiliate with the federation.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 2.